California statutes. Water Code
Any refund authorized to be paid under the provisions of this section may be paid only out of moneys realized from replenishment assessments levied pursuant to Section 71687.2, then or thereafter raised. Upon election of the producer, any refund determined by the board to be owing may be credited to the producer against any subsequent replenishment assessments which might become due and owing from him. No refunds shall be made except as authorized by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71689.

If any producer shall knowingly fail to pay a replenishment assessment within 30 days of when due, such producer shall become liable to the district for interest at the rate of 1 percent per month on the delinquent amount of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71689.1.

Should any operator of a water-producing facility knowingly fail to register his water-producing facility or knowingly fail to file the ground water production statement, or knowingly fail to file and furnish any other reports or statements required by resolution of the board adopted pursuant to Section 71688.1, he shall, in addition to interest as provided in Section 71689, become liable to the district for a penalty of one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71689.2.

The board, at the time of fixing the replenishment assessment rate, may provide by resolution that any producer operating a water-producing facility having a discharge opening not greater than two inches in diameter and providing ground water for domestic or irrigation uses on an area not exceeding one acre in extent, shall pay the amount fixed in such resolution as the replenishment assessment to be paid by such producer. No sworn statement as to the production of ground water from such water-producing facility need be filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71689.3.

(a) The superior court of the principal county may issue a temporary restraining order upon the filing by the district with the court of a verified petition or complaint setting forth that the person named therein as defendant is the operator of a water-producing facility which has not been registered with the district or that the defendant is delinquent in the payment of a replenishment assessment. The temporary restraining order shall be returnable to the court on or before 10 days after its issuance.

(b) The court may issue and grant an injunction restraining and prohibiting the named defendant from the operation of any water-producing facility when it is established by the preponderance of the evidence at a hearing that the defendant has failed to register the water-producing facility with the district or that the defendant is delinquent in the payment of a replenishment assessment. The court may provide that the injunction so made and issued shall be stayed for a period not to exceed 10 days to permit the defendant to register the water-producing facility or to pay the delinquent replenishment assessment.

(c) Service of process shall be made by posting a copy of the summons and complaint upon the water-producing facility or the parcel of land upon which the water-producing facility is located and by personal service of summons and complaint upon the named defendant.

(d) The right to proceed for injunctive relief as provided in this section shall be in addition to any other right which may be provided elsewhere in this act or which may be otherwise allowed by law. The procedure provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure regarding injunctions shall be followed except insofar as it may be otherwise provided in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 410.)
-------------------------------------------

71689.4.

If the board shall have probable cause to believe that the production of ground water from any water-producing facility is in excess of that disclosed by the sworn statements covering such water-producing facility, or if no statements are filed covering a water-producing facility, the board may cause an investigation and report to be made concerning the production of ground water from such water-producing facility. The board may fix the amount of ground water production from any such water-producing facility at an amount not to exceed the maximum production capacity of such water-producing facility; provided, however, where a water-measuring device is permanently attached thereto, the record of production as disclosed by such water-measuring device shall be presumed to be accurate and the burden is upon the district to establish to the contrary.

After such determination has been made by the board, a written notice thereof shall be mailed to the operator of such water-producing facility at his address as shown by the district’s records. Any such determination made by the district shall be conclusive on the operator, and on any producer producing water from such water-producing facility, and the replenishment assessment based thereon, together with interest and penalties, shall be payable forthwith, unless such operator or producer shall file with the board of directors of the district within 10 days after the mailing of such notice a written protest setting forth the ground or grounds for protesting the amount of production so fixed or the replenishment assessment, interest, and penalties so levied thereon. Upon the filing of such protest, the board shall hold a hearing at which time the total amount of the ground water production and the replenishment assessment thereon shall be determined, and the interest and penalties fixed, which action shall be conclusive if based upon substantial evidence. A notice of such hearing shall be mailed to protestant at least 10 days before the date fixed for the hearing. Notice of the determination by the board shall be mailed to each protestant. The producer shall have 20 days from the date of mailing of such notice to pay the replenishment assessment, interest and penalties so fixed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71689.5.

The district may bring a suit in the court having jurisdiction against any producer of ground water from the ground water supplies within the district for the collection of any delinquent replenishment assessment, interest, or penalties. The court having jurisdiction of the suit may, in addition to any judgment, award interest and costs on any judgment as allowed by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

71689.6.

It shall be unlawful to produce groundwater from any water-producing facility within any district from and after one year following the adoption of the resolution provided for in Section 71686 hereof, unless such water-producing facility shall have a water-measuring device affixed thereto capable of registering the accumulated amount of groundwater produced therefrom.

The board by resolution may extend such date on a year-to-year basis upon its determination that availability, price of water-measuring devices, or other circumstances justify such extension. Should the date be extended, notice thereof shall be published in the district pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, such publication to be completed not less than two months prior to the date so extended.

This section shall not be applicable to any operator of a water-producing facility having a discharge opening two inches or less in diameter and providing groundwater for domestic or irrigation uses on an area not exceeding one acre in extent, who is required to pay a replenishment assessment in an amount fixed by resolution of the board of the district as hereinabove in this part provided. 

Violation of this section shall be punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not to exceed six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment. Each day of operation of a water-producing facility in violation hereof shall constitute a separate offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 418.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

71689.7.

Following a final adjudication of all or substantially all of the rights to extract ground water and a determination of the natural safe yield of the ground water supplies within the district, and a determination of the amount or extent to which the rights to extract ground water so adjudicated may be exercised without exceeding the natural safe yield of such ground water supplies, the board shall recognize such judicial determination by exempting from replenishment assessments the amount of water pumped by each person whose rights have been so adjudicated which does not exceed his proportionate share of the natural safe yield of the ground water supplies of the district, as so adjudicated from time to time by the court having jurisdiction over such adjudication proceeding. The replenishment assessment shall thenceforth be levied on each producer by multiplying the production in acre-feet of ground water so produced by such producer’s water-producing facility in excess of his said adjudicated share of the natural safe yield by the rate of the replenishment assessment fixed and levied by the board for the fiscal year in which such production shall occur.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71689.8.

To the extent that the replenishment assessment after adjudication hereunder shifts from all producers to those who extract water in excess of their respective shares of the natural safe yield of the ground water supplies within the district as so adjudicated, such replenishment assessment shall be deemed to benefit those persons who continue to pump and extract ground water in excess of their adjudicated shares of the natural safe yield. Inasmuch as such persons must buy supplemental water or be in contempt of the court’s order limiting their extraction of ground water, they shall be deemed to benefit by the payment of a replenishment assessment which is used to purchase water to supplement the natural supplies of ground water available for use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71689.9.

To the extent that ground water supplies are replenished under this article no person shall acquire any property or other right in the waters provided by the district for replenishment purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Sanitation Service [71689.20. - 71689.27.]

71689.20.

A district may acquire, construct, and operate facilities for, or may contract with others for, the collection and disposal of the garbage, waste, and trash of the district and its inhabitants. A district may not engage in, or contract with others for, the collection and disposal of garbage, waste, and trash in competition with any existing county franchise for the collection and disposal of garbage, waste, and trash.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

71689.21.

The district may prescribe, revise, and collect rates or other charges for the services furnished pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

71689.22.

The district may provide that such rates or charges may be collected with the water or sewer rates, or both, of the district and that all rates shall be billed upon the same bill and collected as one item, and that in the event of failure to pay the whole or any part thereof, the district may discontinue any and all services for which such bill is rendered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

71689.23.

The district may determine whether sanitary service is necessary or feasible for all residents or properties within the district and shall thereupon make a finding as to which type of customer or area shall be excluded from service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

71689.24.

The district shall determine the types of wastes to be excluded from service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

71689.25.

Any contract with other parties for the supplying of this service for the district shall be granted by public bid for such periods as the district determines is in the best interests of the district. In the event of failure to receive a suitable bid, the district may negotiate a contract for service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

71689.26.

A district may adopt ordinances relating to the provision of sanitation services and the regulation of such services. Every such ordinance shall be in full force and effect forthwith upon adoption, but shall be published once in full in a newpaper of general circulation, printed, published and circulated in the district within 10 days after adoption, or if there be no newspaper it shall be posted within such time in three public places within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

71689.27.

From and after the posting or publication of any ordinance as provided in Section 71689.26, it shall be a misdemeanor for any person to violate any ordinance of the district adopted pursuant to Section 71689.26, and upon conviction thereof, such person shall be punished by being imprisoned in the county jail for not more than 30 days, or by fine of not more than six hundred dollars ($600), or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 419.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Property [71690. - 71700.]

71690.

A district may, within or without the district:

(a) Take real and personal property of every kind by grant, purchase, gift, device, or lease.

(b) Hold, use, enjoy, lease, or dispose of real and personal property of every kind.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71691.

A district may:

(a) Acquire, or contract to acquire, waterworks or a waterworks system, waters, water rights, lands, rights, and privileges.

(b) Construct, maintain, and operate conduits, pipelines, reservoirs, works, machinery, and other property useful or necessary to store, convey, supply, or otherwise make use of water for a waterworks plant or system for the benefit of the district.

(c) Complete, extend, add to, repair, or otherwise improve any waterworks or waterworks system acquired by the district.

(d) Carry on and conduct waterworks or a waterworks system.

(e) Construct, maintain, and operate works, facilities improvements and property of the district useful or necessary for the provision, generation, and delivery of hydroelectric power pursuant to Sections 71662 and 71663.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 146.)
-------------------------------------------

71692.

A district may lease from any person, or public corporation or agency, with the privilege of purchasing or otherwise, all or any part of water storage, transportation, or distribution facilities, existing waterworks, or a waterworks system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71693.

A district may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary to supply the district or any portion thereof with water. The district, in exercising such power, shall, in addition to the damage for the taking, injury, or destruction of property, also pay the cost of removal, reconstruction, or relocation of any structure, railways, mains, pipes, conduits, wires, cables, or poles of any public utility which is required to be removed to a new location.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 582.)
-------------------------------------------

71694.

A district may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary to carry out any powers of the district. The district, in exercising such right, shall, in addition to the damage for the taking, injury, or destruction of property, also pay the cost of removal, reconstruction, or relocation of any structure, railways, mains, pipes, conduits, wires, cables, or poles of any public utility which is required to be removed to a new location.

A district shall not exercise the right of eminent domain, under this section, for the condemnation of property outside the boundaries of the district for any purpose, unless it first obtains the consent thereto of the board of supervisors of the county in which such property is located; provided, however, that a district may exercise the right of eminent domain, under this section, for the condemnation of property outside the boundaries of the district for the acquisition of rights-of-way in any county in which territory of the district is located or in any county adjacent to such county without obtaining the consent of the board of supervisors thereof.

When a district proposes to exercise the power of eminent domain, under this section, for the condemnation of property outside the boundaries of the district for the acquisition of rights-of-way in any county in which territory of the district is located or in any county adjacent to such county, it shall give written notice, at least two weeks prior to condemning the property, to the board of supervisors of the county in which the property is located. Such written notice shall contain a description of the property to be condemned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 582.)
-------------------------------------------

71695.

A district may construct works along and across any stream of water, watercourse, street, avenue, highway, canal, ditch, or flume, or across any railway which the route of the works may intersect or cross. Such works shall be constructed in such manner as to afford security for life and property, and the district shall restore the crossings and intersections to their former state as near as may be, or in a manner so as not to have impaired unnecessarily their usefulness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71696.

Every company whose right-of-way is intersected or crossed by district works shall unite with the district in forming the intersections or crossings and grant the rights therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71697.

(a) A district may locate, construct, and maintain district works along and across any street or public highway and on any lands that are now or hereafter owned by the state; and a district has the same rights and privileges appertaining thereto as have been or may be granted to cities within the state. For districts whose territory includes any portion of the redevelopment project area referenced in subdivision (e) of Section 33492.41 of the Health and Safety Code, the exercise of this right shall not be subject to any permitting and approval requirements of any local agency other than the municipal water district that is locating, constructing, or maintaining these district works to the extent that this right is exercised for the purpose of providing facilities or services related to development, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 56426 of the Government Code, to or in that portion of the redevelopment project area that, as of January 1, 2000, meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Is unincorporated territory.

(2) Contains at least 100 acres.

(3) Is surrounded or substantially surrounded by incorporated territory.

(4) Contains at least 100 acres zoned for commercial or industrial uses or is designated on the applicable county general plan for commercial or industrial uses.

(b) Facilities or services related to development may be provided by the district to all or any portion of the area defined in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a). Notwithstanding any other provision of the Government Code, building ordinances, zoning ordinances, and any other local ordinances, rules, and regulations of a city or other political subdivision of the state shall not apply to the location, construction, or maintenance of facilities or services related to development pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 129, Sec. 5.   Effective July 14, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

71698.

Any use by the district of a public highway now or hereafter constituted a state highway shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 660) of Division 1 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71699.

No publicly owned utility shall commence to provide any water service for, on, or to any land within a municipal water district which is subject to (1) the lien of a bonded indebtedness incurred by the district for the purpose of providing a service similar to that which the utility proposes to provide or (2) a lien of an indebtedness arising under any contract between the district and the United States of America incurred or contracted by the district for the purpose of providing water service; provided, that a majority of the voters voting at an election within the district have approved the incurrence of the indebtedness and, provided further, that the district has water available and is ready, able, and willing to serve such land.

However, a publicly owned utility may commence to provide service, otherwise prohibited, upon either of the following conditions:

(a) In any portion of such a municipal water district proposed to be served by the publicly owned utility in which the total number of registered voters residing therein is less than 12, and in which the municipal water district (1) receives the written consent of at least a majority of the owners of real property holding at least a majority in value of the real property and (2) consents to the service by resolution.

(b) In any portion of such a municipal water district proposed to be served by the publicly owned utility in which the total number of registered voters residing therein is 12 or more, and in which at least a majority of the voters voting on the proposition shall have voted at a special municipal water district election to permit such service within that portion of the district. The election shall be called and held within that portion of the district in the same manner as an initiative measure pursuant to Section 71530.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1272.)
-------------------------------------------

71700.

Any publicly owned utility which commences to provide any water service for, on, or to any land within a municipal water district which is providing service to the land and which land at the commencement of such service is subject to the lien of a bonded or contract indebtedness with revenues pledged for their payment, shall reimburse the district from the water revenues derived from charges made for service to such land, the amount which would have been paid by the district from water revenues for such bond or contract payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1272.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Contracts [71720. - 71733.]



  ARTICLE 1. Contracts With Other Agencies [71720. - 71726.]

71720.

As used in this article:

(a) “Public agency” means and includes the United States or any department or agency thereof, the State or any department or agency thereof, and a county, city, public corporation, or public district of the State.

(b) “Private corporation” means and includes any private corporation organized under the laws of the United States or of this or any other state thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71721.

Contracts mentioned in this article include those made with the United States under the Federal Reclamation Act of June 17, 1902, and all acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto, or any other act of Congress heretofore or hereafter enacted permitting co-operation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71722.

A district may join with one or more public agencies, private corporations, or other persons for the purpose of carrying out any of the powers of the district, and for that purpose may contract with such other public agencies, private corporations, or persons to finance acquisitions, constructions and operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71723.

The contracts with other public agencies, private corporations, or persons may provide for contributions to be made by each party thereto, for the division and apportionment of the expenses of the acquisitions and operations, and for the division and apportionment of the benefits, the services, and products therefrom. Such contracts may also provide for an agency to effect the acquisitions and to carry on the operations, and shall provide in the powers and methods of procedure for such agency the method by which the agency may contract. Such contracts may contain such other and further covenants and agreements as may be necessary or convenient to accomplish the purposes thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71724.

Any such contract with the United States or any department or agency thereof, or with any private corporation organized under the laws of the United States, by which the district or an improvement district thereof incurs an indebtedness or liability exceeding in any year the income and revenue for such year, shall not be executed without the assent of a majority of the qualified electors of the district or the improvement district voting at an election to be held for that purpose. Such election shall be called and held, so far as practicable, in the same manner as bond elections for the district or an improvement district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

71725.

The exact final form of a proposed contract required to be approved by the voters of the district or an improvement district need not be available at the time of the special election, but the purpose of the contract, the maximum amount of the indebtedness created thereby, the maximum term of repayment, and the maximum interest rate on such indebtedness shall be known and included in the proposition or measure submitted to the voters of the district or the improvement district at the special election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71726.

Any proposed contract approved by the voters of the Rainbow Municipal Water District, as provided in this article, at a special election held prior to January 1, 1978, shall be an approved contract notwithstanding that the maximum interest rate on such indebtedness was not known at the time of the special election and was not included in the proposition submitted to the voters of the district at the special election.

The provisions of this section are necessary because of special circumstances within the Rainbow Municipal Water District. A special election was held in the Rainbow Municipal Water District at which there was submitted to the voters of the district the proposition to approve a contract with the United States for a loan for the acquisition and construction of water facilities. At the time the proposed contract was submitted to the voters of the district the maximum interest rate on the indebtedness was not known and was not included in the proposition, although the voters were informed of the approximate rate of interest on the indebtedness. The proposed contract was approved by the voters and the district must enter into the contract in order to provide needed water to the inhabitants of the district. It is therefore hereby declared that a general law cannot be made applicable and that the enactment of this section as a special law is necessary for the solution of problems existing in the Rainbow Municipal Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 449.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Central Basin Municipal Water District [71730. - 71733.]

71730.

(a) For the purposes of this article, “district” means the Central Basin Municipal Water District.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article that the district make better use of the funds it spends on services, that it does not unnecessarily use amendments that limit competitive bidding for its contracts, and that its contract amendments reflect the authorization of the district’s board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   (SB 953)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

71731.

(a) The district shall not use sole source contracts unless one of the following conditions is met:

(1) The contract is limited to an emergency circumstance.

(2) The circumstances are that only one vendor can meet the district’s needs.

(b) Before executing a sole source contract, the district shall provide written justification demonstrating the reasons for not competitively bidding the services. The justification shall include all of the following information:

(1) The background
 of the purchase.

(2) A description of the vendor’s uniqueness.

(3) An explanation of the consequences of not purchasing from the vendor.

(4) Market research to substantiate a lack of competition.

(5) An analysis of pricing and alternatives.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   (SB 953)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

71732.

The district shall rebid a contract if the district significantly changes the scope of work of the contract. Significant changes include, but are not limited to, changes to the nature of the services or work products.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   (SB 953)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

71733.

The general manager of the district shall submit a quarterly report to the district’s board detailing all of the district’s contracts, contract amendments, and contract and amendment dollar amounts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   (SB 953)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Controversies [71750. - 71760.]

71750.

A district may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided in this division or by law, in all actions and proceedings in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71751.

A district may commence, maintain, intervene in, and compromise, in the name of the district, any action or proceeding involving or affecting the ownership or use of water or water rights within the district, used or useful for any purpose of the district, or a common benefit to lands within the district or inhabitants of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71752.

An action to determine the validity of any contract authorized by Article 1 (commencing with Section 71720) of Chapter 5 of this part and any bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1151.)
-------------------------------------------

71753.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------

71757.

To carry out the purposes of this division, a district shall have the power to commence, maintain, intervene in, defend and compromise, in the name of the district, or as a class representative of the inhabitants, property owners, taxpayers, water producers or water users within the district, or otherwise, and to assume the costs and expenses of any and all actions and proceedings now or hereafter begun to determine or adjudicate all or substantially all of the water rights of a basin or other hydrologic unit overlain, in whole or in part, by the district, as between owners of or claimants to such rights, to prevent any interference with water or water rights used or useful to the lands, inhabitants, owners, operators, or producers within the district, or to prevent the diminution of the quantity or quality of the water supply of the district or such basin, or to prevent unlawful exportation of water from the district or such basin.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

71758.

The district may employ counsel to defend any action brought against it or against any of its officers, agents or employees on account of any claimed action or inaction involving any claimed injury, taking, damage or destruction, and the fees and expenses involved therein shall be a lawful charge against the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

71759.

If any officer, agent or employee of the district is held liable for any act or omission in his official capacity, except in case of actual fraud or actual malice, and any judgment is rendered thereon, the district shall pay the judgment without obligation for repayment by the officer, agent or employee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

71760.

(a) (1) The Elsinore Valley Municipal Water District and the Eastern Municipal Water District shall not be held liable for claims by past or existing County Water Company of Riverside customers or those who consumed water provided through the County Water Company of Riverside water system concerning the operation and supply of water from the County Water Company of Riverside water system during the interim operation period specified in subdivision (c) for any good faith, reasonable effort using ordinary care to assume possession of, to operate, or to supply water to the County Water Company of Riverside water system.

(2) The Elsinore Valley Municipal Water District and the Eastern
 Municipal Water District shall not be held liable for claims by past or existing County Water Company of Riverside customers or by those who consumed water provided through the County Water Company of Riverside water system for any injury that occurred prior to the commencement of the interim operation period specified in subdivision (c).

(b) (1) (A) The Western Municipal Water District and the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California shall not be held liable for claims by past or existing County Water Company of Riverside customers or by those who consumed water provided through the County Water Company of Riverside water system concerning the provision of supplemental imported water supplies to the County Water Company of Riverside water system during the interim operation period specified in subdivision (c) for any good faith, reasonable effort using ordinary care to supply water to the
 County Water Company of Riverside water system.

(B) The Western Municipal Water District and the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California shall not be held liable for claims by past or existing County Water Company of Riverside customers or by those who consumed water provided through the County Water Company of Riverside water system concerning the operation and supply of water from the County Water Company of Riverside water system for any injury that occurred prior to the commencement of the interim operation period specified in subdivision (c).

(2) This subdivision shall only apply if the water supplied by the Western Municipal Water District and the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California through the temporary potable service pipeline to the County Water Company of Riverside water system meets or exceeds federal and state drinking water quality
 standards.

(c) (1) The interim operation period shall commence upon the connection of a temporary potable service pipeline by either the Elsinore Valley Municipal Water District or the Eastern Municipal Water District to the County Water Company of Riverside water system, or upon the execution of an agreement between the Elsinore Valley Municipal Water District, the Eastern Municipal Water District, the County Water Company of Riverside, and any other signatories to provide service to the customers of the County Water Company of Riverside, whichever occurs first.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the interim operation period shall last until permanent replacement facilities are accepted by the Elsinore Valley Municipal Water District and the Eastern Municipal Water District with the concurrence of the State Department of
 Public Health or December 31, 2015, whichever occurs first.

(B) Upon the showing of good cause, the interim operation period shall be extended by the State Department of Public Health for up to three successive one-year periods at the request of the Elsinore Valley Municipal Water District and the Eastern Municipal Water District.

(3) The acceptance date of permanent replacement facilities shall be publicly noticed by the Elsinore Valley Municipal Water District and the Eastern Municipal Water District.

(d) Subdivision (a) shall only apply if the Elsinore Valley Municipal Water District and the Eastern Municipal Water District provide water to the County Water Company of Riverside water system in accordance with all of the following conditions:

(1) The
 Elsinore Valley Municipal Water District and the Eastern Municipal Water District shall comply with the special terms and conditions established by the State Department of Public Health for safe drinking water emergency funding pursuant to Section 75021 of the Public Resources Code for the interim operation period.

(2) Water provided by the Elsinore Valley Municipal Water District and the Eastern Municipal Water District through the temporary potable service pipeline to the County Water Company of Riverside water system shall meet or exceed federal and state drinking water quality standards.

(3) Reasonable water system flow and pressure through the temporary potable service pipeline shall be maintained during the interim operation period based upon the condition and integrity of the existing County Water Company of Riverside water system and any disruptions to water delivery
 resulting from construction related activities associated with the installation of permanent replacement facilities shall be minimal.
